Oklahoma, session 2026, SB154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 991a, as


last amended by Section 1, Chapter 61, O.S.L. 2024 (22 O.S. Supp.


2024, Section 991a), is amended to read as follows:


Section 991a. A. Except as otherwise provided in the Elderly


and Incapacitated Victim’s Protection Program, when a defendant is


convicted of a crime and no death sentence is imposed, the court


shall either:


1. Suspend the execution of sentence in whole or in part, with


or without probation. The court, in addition, may order the


convicted defendant at the time of sentencing or at any time during


the suspended sentence to do one or more of the following:

Req. No. 1320 Page 1


a. to provide restitution to the victim as provided by


Section 991f et seq. of this title or according to a


schedule of payments established by the sentencing


court, together with interest upon any pecuniary sum


at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum, if the


defendant agrees to pay such restitution or, in the


opinion of the court, if the defendant is able to pay


such restitution without imposing manifest hardship on


the defendant or the immediate family and if the


extent of the damage to the victim is determinable


with reasonable certainty. The court shall prioritize


an order for payments of restitution to the victim to


the extent feasible,


b. to reimburse any state agency for amounts paid by the


state agency for hospital and medical expenses


incurred by the victim or victims, as a result of the


criminal act for which such person was convicted,


which reimbursement shall be made directly to the


state agency, with interest accruing thereon at the


rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum,


c. to engage in a term of community service without


compensation, according to a schedule consistent with


the employment and family responsibilities of the


person convicted,

Req. No. 1320 Page 2


d. to pay a reasonable sum into any trust fund


established pursuant to the provisions of Sections 176


through 180.4 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes and


which provides restitution payments by convicted


defendants to victims of crimes committed within this


state wherein such victim has incurred a financial


loss,


e. to confinement in the county jail for a period not to


exceed six (6) months,


f. to confinement as provided by law together with a term


of post-imprisonment community supervision for not


less than three (3) years of the total term allowed by


law for imprisonment, with or without restitution;


provided, however, the authority of this provision is


limited to Section 843.5 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes when the offense involved sexual abuse or


sexual exploitation; Sections 681, 741 and 843.1 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes when the offense


involved sexual abuse or sexual exploitation; and


Sections 865 et seq., 885, 886, 888, 891, 1021,


1021.2, 1021.3, 1040.13a, 1087, 1088, 1111.1, 1115 and


1123 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


g. to repay the reward or part of the reward paid by a


local certified crime stoppers program and the

Req. No. 1320 Page 3


Oklahoma Reward System. In determining whether the


defendant shall repay the reward or part of the


reward, the court shall consider the ability of the


defendant to make the payment, the financial hardship


on the defendant to make the required payment and the


importance of the information to the prosecution of


the defendant as provided by the arresting officer or


the district attorney with due regard for the


confidentiality of the records of the local certified


crime stoppers program and the Oklahoma Reward System.


The court shall assess this repayment against the


defendant as a cost of prosecution. The term


“certified” means crime stoppers organizations that


annually meet the certification standards for crime


stoppers programs established by the Oklahoma Crime


Stoppers Association to the extent those standards do


not conflict with state statutes. The term “court”


refers to all municipal and district courts within


this state. The “Oklahoma Reward System” means the


reward program established by Section 150.18 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes,


h. to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation for costs incurred by that agency during


its investigation of the crime for which the defendant

Req. No. 1320 Page 4


pleaded guilty, nolo contendere or was convicted


including compensation for laboratory, technical or


investigation services performed by the Bureau if, in


the opinion of the court, the defendant is able to pay


without imposing manifest hardship on the defendant,


and if the costs incurred by the Bureau during the


investigation of the defendant’s case may be


determined with reasonable certainty,


i. to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation and any authorized law enforcement


agency for all costs incurred by that agency for


cleaning up an illegal drug laboratory site for which


the defendant pleaded guilty, nolo contendere or was


convicted. The court clerk shall collect the amount


and may retain five percent (5%) of such monies to be


deposited in the Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund to cover


administrative costs and shall remit the remainder to


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation to be


deposited in the OSBI Revolving Fund established by


Section 150.19a of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes


or to the general fund wherein the other law


enforcement agency is located,


j. to pay a reasonable sum to the Crime Victims


Compensation Board, created by Section 142.2 et seq.

Req. No. 1320 Page 5


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, for the benefit


of crime victims,


k. to reimburse the court fund for amounts paid to court-


appointed attorneys for representing the defendant in


the case in which the person is being sentenced,


l. to participate in an assessment and evaluation by an


assessment agency or assessment personnel certified by


the Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse


Services pursuant to Section 3-460 of Title 43A of the


Oklahoma Statutes and, as determined by the


assessment, participate in an alcohol and drug


substance abuse course or treatment program or both,


pursuant to Sections 3-452 and 3-453 of Title 43A of


the Oklahoma Statutes, or as ordered by the court,


m. to be placed in a victims impact panel program, as


defined in subsection H of this section, or


victim/offender reconciliation program and payment of


a fee to the program of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00)


as set by the governing authority of the program to


offset the cost of participation by the defendant.


Provided, each victim/offender reconciliation program


shall be required to obtain a written consent form


voluntarily signed by the victim and defendant that


specifies the methods to be used to resolve the

Req. No. 1320 Page 6


issues, the obligations and rights of each person and


the confidentiality of the proceedings. Volunteer


mediators and employees of a victim/offender


reconciliation program shall be immune from liability


and have rights of confidentiality as provided in


Section 1805 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


n. to install, at the expense of the defendant, an


ignition interlock device approved by the Board of


Tests for Alcohol and Drug Influence. The device


shall be installed upon every motor vehicle operated


by the defendant, and the court shall require that a


notation of this restriction be affixed to the


defendant’s driver license. The restriction shall


remain on the driver license not exceeding two (2)


years to be determined by the court. The restriction


may be modified or removed only by order of the court


and notice of any modification order shall be given to


Service Oklahoma. Upon the expiration of the period


for the restriction, Service Oklahoma shall remove the


restriction without further court order. Failure to


comply with the order to install an ignition interlock


device or operating any vehicle without a device


during the period of restriction shall be a violation


of the sentence and may be punished as deemed proper

Req. No. 1320 Page 7


by the sentencing court. As used in this paragraph,


“ignition interlock device” means a device that,


without tampering or intervention by another person,


would prevent the defendant from operating a motor


vehicle if the defendant has a blood or breath alcohol


concentration of two-hundredths (0.02) or greater,


o. to be confined by electronic monitoring administered


and supervised by the Department of Corrections or a


community sentence provider, and payment of a


monitoring fee to the supervising authority, not to


exceed Three Hundred Dollars ($300.00) per month. Any


fees collected pursuant to this subparagraph shall be


deposited with the appropriate supervising authority.


Any willful violation of an order of the court for the


payment of the monitoring fee shall be a violation of


the sentence and may be punished as deemed proper by


the sentencing court. As used in this paragraph,


“electronic monitoring” means confinement of the


defendant within a specified location or locations


with supervision by means of an electronic device


approved by the Department of Corrections which is


designed to detect if the defendant is in the court-


ordered location at the required times and which



Req. No. 1320 Page 8


records violations for investigation by a qualified


supervisory agency or person,


p. to perform one or more courses of treatment, education


or rehabilitation for any conditions, behaviors,


deficiencies or disorders which may contribute to


criminal conduct including but not limited to alcohol


and substance abuse, mental health, emotional health,


physical health, propensity for violence, antisocial


behavior, personality or attitudes, deviant sexual


behavior, child development, parenting assistance, job


skills, vocational-technical skills, domestic


relations, literacy, education or any other


identifiable deficiency which may be treated


appropriately in the community and for which a


certified provider or a program recognized by the


court as having significant positive impact exists in


the community. Any treatment, education or


rehabilitation provider required to be certified


pursuant to law or rule shall be certified by the


appropriate state agency or a national organization,


q. to submit to periodic testing for alcohol,


intoxicating substance or controlled dangerous


substances by a qualified laboratory,



Req. No. 1320 Page 9


r. to pay a fee or costs for treatment, education,


supervision, participation in a program or any


combination thereof as determined by the court, based


upon the defendant’s ability to pay the fees or costs,


s. to be supervised by a Department of Corrections


employee, a private supervision provider or other


person designated by the court,


t. to obtain positive behavior modeling by a trained


mentor,


u. to serve a term of confinement in a restrictive


housing facility available in the community,


v. to serve a term of confinement in the county jail at


night or during weekends pursuant to Section 991a-2 of


this title or for work release,


w. to obtain employment or participate in employment-


related activities,


x. to participate in mandatory day reporting to


facilities or persons for services, payments, duties


or person-to-person contacts as specified by the


court,


y. to pay day fines not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of


the net wages earned. For purposes of this paragraph,


“day fine” means the offender is ordered to pay an


amount calculated as a percentage of net daily wages

Req. No. 1320 Page 10


earned. The day fine shall be paid to the local


community sentencing system as reparation to the


community. Day fines shall be used to support the


local system,


z. to submit to blood or saliva testing as required by


subsection I of this section,


aa. to repair or restore property damaged by the


defendant’s conduct, if the court determines the


defendant possesses sufficient skill to repair or


restore the property and the victim consents to the


repairing or restoring of the property,


bb. to restore damaged property in kind or payment of out-


of-pocket expenses to the victim, if the court is able


to determine the actual out-of-pocket expenses


suffered by the victim,


cc. to attend a victim-offender reconciliation program if


the victim agrees to participate and the offender is


deemed appropriate for participation,


dd. in the case of a person convicted of prostitution


pursuant to Section 1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, require such person to receive counseling


for the behavior which may have caused such person to


engage in prostitution activities. Such person may be


required to receive counseling in areas including but

Req. No. 1320 Page 11


not limited to alcohol and substance abuse, sexual


behavior problems or domestic abuse or child abuse


problems,


ee. in the case of a sex offender sentenced after November


1, 1989, and required by law to register pursuant to


the Sex Offender Registration Act, the court shall


require the person to comply with sex offender


specific rules and conditions of supervision


established by the Department of Corrections and


require the person to participate in a treatment


program designed for the treatment of sex offenders


during the period of time while the offender is


subject to supervision by the Department of


Corrections. The treatment program shall include


polygraph examinations specifically designed for use


with sex offenders for purposes of supervision and


treatment compliance, and shall be administered not


less than each six (6) months during the period of


supervision. The examination shall be administered by


a certified licensed polygraph examiner. The


treatment program must be approved by the Department


of Corrections or the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services. Such treatment shall be at



Req. No. 1320 Page 12


the expense of the defendant based on the defendant’s


ability to pay,


ff. in addition to other sentencing powers of the court,


the court in the case of a defendant being sentenced


for a felony conviction for a violation of Section 2-


402 of Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes which


involves marijuana may require the person to


participate in a drug court program, if available. If


a drug court program is not available, the defendant


may be required to participate in a community


sanctions program, if available,


gg. in the case of a person convicted of any false or


bogus check violation, as defined in Section 1541.4 of


Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, impose a fee of


Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00) to the victim for each


check, and impose a bogus check fee to be paid to the


district attorney. The bogus check fee paid to the


district attorney shall be equal to the amount


assessed as court costs plus Twenty-five Dollars


($25.00) for each check upon filing of the case in


district court. This money shall be deposited in the


Bogus Check Restitution Program Fund as established in


subsection B of Section 114 of this title.


Additionally, the court may require the offender to

Req. No. 1320 Page 13


pay restitution and bogus check fees on any other


bogus check or checks that have been submitted to the


Bogus Check Restitution Program, and


hh. any other provision specifically ordered by the court.


However, any such order for restitution, community service,


payment to a local certified crime stoppers program, payment to the


Oklahoma Reward System or confinement in the county jail, or a


combination thereof, shall be made in conjunction with probation and


shall be made a condition of the suspended sentence.


However, unless under the supervision of the district attorney,


the offender shall be required to pay Forty Dollars ($40.00) per


month to the district attorney during the first two (2) years of


probation to compensate the district attorney for the costs incurred


during the prosecution of the offender and for the additional work


of verifying the compliance of the offender with the rules and


conditions of his or her probation. The district attorney may waive


any part of this requirement in the best interests of justice. The


court shall not waive, suspend, defer or dismiss the costs of


prosecution in its entirety. However, if the court determines that


a reduction in the fine, costs and costs of prosecution is


warranted, the court shall equally apply the same percentage


reduction to the fine, costs and costs of prosecution owed by the


offender;



Req. No. 1320 Page 14


2. Impose a fine prescribed by law for the offense, with or


without probation or commitment and with or without restitution or


service as provided for in this section, Section 991a-4.1 of this


title or Section 227 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


3. Commit such person for confinement provided for by law with


or without restitution as provided for in this section;


4. Order the defendant to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Investigation for costs incurred by that agency during its


investigation of the crime for which the defendant pleaded guilty,


nolo contendere or was convicted including compensation for


laboratory, technical or investigation services performed by the


Bureau if, in the opinion of the court, the defendant is able to pay


without imposing manifest hardship on the defendant, and if the


costs incurred by the Bureau during the investigation of the


defendant’s case may be determined with reasonable certainty;


5. Order the defendant to reimburse the Oklahoma State Bureau


of Investigation for all costs incurred by that agency for cleaning


up an illegal drug laboratory site for which the defendant pleaded


guilty, nolo contendere or was convicted. The court clerk shall


collect the amount and may retain five percent (5%) of such monies


to be deposited in the Court Clerk’s Revolving Fund to cover


administrative costs and shall remit the remainder to the Oklahoma


State Bureau of Investigation to be deposited in the OSBI Revolving



Req. No. 1320 Page 15


Fund established by Section 150.19a of Title 74 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


6. In the case of nonviolent felony offenses, sentence such


person to the Community Service Sentencing Program;


7. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in


the case of a person convicted of operating or being in control of a


motor vehicle while the person was under the influence of alcohol,


other intoxicating substance or a combination of alcohol or another


intoxicating substance, or convicted of operating a motor vehicle


while the ability of the person to operate such vehicle was impaired


due to the consumption of alcohol, require such person:


a. to participate in an alcohol and drug assessment and


evaluation by an assessment agency or assessment


personnel certified by the Department of Mental Health


and Substance Abuse Services pursuant to Section 3-460


of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes and, as


determined by the assessment, participate in an


alcohol and drug substance abuse course or treatment


program or both, pursuant to Sections 3-452 and 3-453


of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. to attend a victims impact panel program, as defined


in subsection H of this section, and to pay a fee of


Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) as set by the governing


authority of the program and approved by the court, to

Req. No. 1320 Page 16


the program to offset the cost of participation by the


defendant, if in the opinion of the court the


defendant has the ability to pay such fee,


c. to both participate in the alcohol and drug substance


abuse course or treatment program, pursuant to


subparagraph a of this paragraph and attend a victims


impact panel program, pursuant to subparagraph b of


this paragraph,


d. to install, at the expense of the person, an ignition


interlock device approved by the Board of Tests for


Alcohol and Drug Influence, upon every motor vehicle


operated by such person and to require that a notation


of this restriction be affixed to the person’s driver


license at the time of reinstatement of the license.


The restriction shall remain on the driver license for


such period as the court shall determine. The


restriction may be modified or removed by order of the


court and notice of the order shall be given to


Service Oklahoma. Upon the expiration of the period


for the restriction, Service Oklahoma shall remove the


restriction without further court order. Failure to


comply with the order to install an ignition interlock


device or operating any vehicle without such device


during the period of restriction shall be a violation

Req. No. 1320 Page 17


of the sentence and may be punished as deemed proper


by the sentencing court, or


e. beginning January 1, 1993, to submit to electronically


monitored home detention administered and supervised


by the Department of Corrections, and to pay to the


Department a monitoring fee, not to exceed Seventy-


five Dollars ($75.00) a month, to the Department of


Corrections, if in the opinion of the court the


defendant has the ability to pay such fee. Any fees


collected pursuant to this subparagraph shall be


deposited in the Department of Corrections Revolving


Fund. Any order by the court for the payment of the


monitoring fee, if willfully disobeyed, may be


enforced as an indirect contempt of court;


8. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in


the case of a person convicted of prostitution pursuant to Section


1029 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, require such person to


receive counseling for the behavior which may have caused such


person to engage in prostitution activities. Such person may be


required to receive counseling in areas including but not limited to


alcohol and substance abuse, sexual behavior problems or domestic


abuse or child abuse problems;


9. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in


the case of a person convicted of any crime related to domestic

Req. No. 1320 Page 18


abuse, as defined in Section 60.1 of this title, the court may


require the defendant to undergo the treatment or participate in the


counseling services necessary to bring about the cessation of


domestic abuse against the victim. The defendant may be required to


pay all or part of the cost of the treatment or counseling services;


10. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,


the court, in the case of a sex offender sentenced after November 1,


1989, and required by law to register pursuant to the Sex Offenders


Registration Act, shall require the defendant to participate in a


treatment program designed specifically for the treatment of sex


offenders, if available. The treatment program will include


polygraph examinations specifically designed for use with sex


offenders for the purpose of supervision and treatment compliance,


provided the examination is administered by a certified licensed


polygraph examiner. The treatment program must be approved by the


Department of Corrections or the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services. Such treatment shall be at the expense of


the defendant based on the ability of the defendant to pay;


11. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,


the court, in the case of a person convicted of abuse or neglect of


a child, as defined in Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma


Statutes, may require the person to undergo treatment or to


participate in counseling services. The defendant may be required



Req. No. 1320 Page 19


to pay all or part of the cost of the treatment or counseling


services;


12. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,


the court, in the case of a person convicted of cruelty to animals


pursuant to Section 1685 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, may


require the person to pay restitution to animal facilities for


medical care and any boarding costs of victimized animals;


13. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, a


sex offender who is habitual or aggravated as defined by Section 584


of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes and who is required to register


as a sex offender pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act


shall be supervised by the Department of Corrections for the


duration of the registration period and shall be assigned to a


global position monitoring device by the Department of Corrections


for the duration of the registration period. The cost of such


monitoring device shall be reimbursed by the offender;


14. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in


the case of a sex offender who is required by law to register


pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, the court may


prohibit the person from accessing or using any Internet social


networking website that has the potential or likelihood of allowing


the sex offender to have contact with any child who is under the age


of eighteen (18) years;



Req. No. 1320 Page 20


15. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court, in


the case of a sex offender who is required by law to register


pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, the court shall


require the person to register any electronic mail address


information, instant message, chat or other Internet communication


name or identity information that the person uses or intends to use


while accessing the Internet or used for other purposes of social


networking or other similar Internet communication; or


16. In addition to the other sentencing powers of the court,


and pursuant to the terms and conditions of a written plea


agreement, the court may prohibit the defendant from entering,


visiting or residing within the judicial district in which the


defendant was convicted until after completion of his or her


sentence; provided, however, the court shall ensure that the


defendant has access to those services or programs for which the


defendant is required to participate as a condition of probation.


When seeking to enter the prohibited judicial district for personal


business not related to his or her criminal case, the defendant


shall be required to obtain approval by the court.


B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who


is found guilty of a violation of any provision of Section 761 or


11-902 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes or any person pleading


guilty or nolo contendere for a violation of any provision of such


sections shall be ordered to participate in, prior to sentencing, an

Req. No. 1320 Page 21


alcohol and drug assessment and evaluation by an assessment agency


or assessment personnel certified by the Department of Mental Health


and Substance Abuse Services for the purpose of evaluating the


receptivity to treatment and prognosis of the person. The court


shall order the person to reimburse the agency or assessor for the


evaluation. The fee shall be the amount provided in subsection C of


Section 3-460 of Title 43A of the Oklahoma Statutes. The evaluation


shall be conducted at a certified assessment agency, the office of a


certified assessor or at another location as ordered by the court.


The agency or assessor shall, within seventy-two (72) hours from the


time the person is assessed, submit a written report to the court


for the purpose of assisting the court in its final sentencing


determination. No person, agency or facility operating an alcohol


and drug substance abuse evaluation program certified by the


Department of Mental Health and Substance Abuse Services shall


solicit or refer any person evaluated pursuant to this subsection


for any treatment program or alcohol and drug substance abuse


service in which such person, agency or facility has a vested


interest; however, this provision shall not be construed to prohibit


the court from ordering participation in or any person from


voluntarily utilizing a treatment program or alcohol and drug


substance abuse service offered by such person, agency or facility.


If a person is sentenced to the custody of the Department of


Corrections and the court has received a written evaluation report

Req. No. 1320 Page 22


pursuant to this subsection, the report shall be furnished to the


Department of Corrections with the judgment and sentence. Any


evaluation report submitted to the court pursuant to this subsection


shall be handled in a manner which will keep such report


confidential from the general public’s review. Nothing contained in


this subsection shall be construed to prohibit the court from


ordering judgment and sentence in the event the defendant fails or


refuses to comply with an order of the court to obtain the


evaluation required by this subsection.


C. When sentencing a person convicted of a crime, the court


shall first consider a program of restitution for the victim, as


well as imposition of a fine or incarceration of the offender. The


provisions of paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section shall not


apply to defendants being sentenced upon their third or subsequent


to their third conviction of a felony. Provided, the court may


waive these prohibitions upon written application of the district


attorney. Both the application and the waiver shall be made part of


the record of the case.


D. When sentencing a person convicted of a crime, the judge


shall consider any victim impact statements if submitted to the


jury, or the judge in the event a jury is waived.


E. Probation, for purposes of subsection A of this section, is


a procedure by which a defendant found guilty of a crime, whether


upon a verdict or plea of guilty or upon a plea of nolo contendere,

Req. No. 1320 Page 23


is released by the court subject to conditions imposed by the court


and subject to supervision by the Department of Corrections, a


private supervision provider or other person designated by the


court. Such supervision shall be initiated upon an order of


probation from the court, and shall not exceed two (2) years, unless


a petition alleging a violation of any condition of deferred


judgment or seeking revocation of the suspended sentence is filed


during the supervision, or as otherwise provided by law. In the


case of a person convicted of a sex offense, supervision shall begin


immediately upon release from incarceration or if parole is granted


and shall not be limited to two (2) years. Provided further, any


supervision provided for in this section may be extended for a


period not to exceed the expiration of the maximum term or terms of


the sentence upon a determination by the court or the Division of


Probation and Parole of the Department of Corrections that the best


interests of the public and the release will be served by an


extended period of supervision.


F. The Department of Corrections, or such other agency as the


court may designate, shall be responsible for the monitoring and


administration of the restitution and service programs provided for


by subparagraphs a, c and d of paragraph 1 of subsection A of this


section, and shall ensure that restitution payments are forwarded to


the victim and that service assignments are properly performed.



Req. No. 1320 Page 24


G. 1. The Department of Corrections is hereby authorized,


subject to funds available through appropriation by the Legislature,


to contract with counties for the administration of county Community


Service Sentencing Programs.


2. Any offender eligible to participate in the Program pursuant


to this section shall be eligible to participate in a county


Program; provided, participation in county-funded Programs shall not


be limited to offenders who would otherwise be sentenced to


confinement with the Department of Corrections.


3. The Department shall establish criteria and specifications


for contracts with counties for such Programs. A county may apply


to the Department for a contract for a county-funded Program for a


specific period of time. The Department shall be responsible for


ensuring that any contracting county complies in full with


specifications and requirements of the contract. The contract shall


set appropriate compensation to the county for services to the


Department.


4. The Department is hereby authorized to provide technical


assistance to any county in establishing a Program, regardless of


whether the county enters into a contract pursuant to this


subsection. Technical assistance shall include appropriate


staffing, development of community resources, sponsorship,


supervision and any other requirements.



Req. No. 1320 Page 25


5. The Department shall annually make a report to the Governor,


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House


on the number of such Programs, the number of participating


offenders, the success rates of each Program according to criteria


established by the Department and the costs of each Program.


H. As used in this section:


1. “Ignition interlock device” means a device that, without


tampering or intervention by another person, would prevent the


defendant from operating a motor vehicle if the defendant has a


blood or breath alcohol concentration of two-hundredths (0.02) or


greater;


2. “Electronically monitored home detention” means


incarceration of the defendant within a specified location or


locations with monitoring by means of a device approved by the


Department of Corrections that detects if the person leaves the


confines of any specified location; and


3. “Victims impact panel program” means a program conducted by


a corporation registered with the Secretary of State in Oklahoma for


the sole purpose of operating a victims impact panel program. The


program shall include live presentations from presenters who will


share personal stories with participants about how alcohol, drug


abuse, the operation of a motor vehicle while using an electronic


communication device or the illegal conduct of others has personally


impacted the lives of the presenters. A victims impact panel

Req. No. 1320 Page 26


program shall be attended by persons who have committed the offense


of driving, operating or being in actual physical control of a motor


vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other intoxicating


substance, operating a motor vehicle while the ability of the person


to operate such vehicle was impaired due to the consumption of


alcohol or any other substance or operating a motor vehicle while


using an electronic device or by persons who have been convicted of


furnishing alcoholic beverage to persons under twenty-one (21) years


of age, as provided in Sections 6-101 and 6-120 of Title 37A of the


Oklahoma Statutes. Persons attending a victims impact panel program


shall be required to pay a fee of Seventy-five Dollars ($75.00) to


the provider of the program. A certificate of completion shall be


issued to the person upon satisfying the attendance and fee


requirements of the victims impact panel program. The certificate


of completion shall contain the business identification number of


the program provider. A certified assessment agency, certified


assessor or provider of an alcohol and drug substance abuse course


shall be prohibited from providing a victims impact panel program


and shall further be prohibited from having any proprietary or


pecuniary interest in a victims impact panel program. The provider


of the victims impact panel program shall carry general liability


insurance and maintain an accurate accounting of all business


transactions and funds received in relation to the victims impact


panel program. Beginning October 1, 2020, and each October 1

Req. No. 1320 Page 27


thereafter, the provider of the victims impact panel program shall


provide to the District Attorneys Council the following:


a. proof of registration with the Oklahoma Secretary of


State,


b. proof of general liability insurance,


c. end-of-year financial statements prepared by a


certified public accountant,


d. a copy of federal income tax returns filed with the


Internal Revenue Service,


e. a registration fee of One Thousand Dollars


($1,000.00). The registration fee shall be deposited


in the District Attorneys Council Revolving Fund


created in Section 215.28 of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes, and


f. a statement certifying that the provider of the


victims impact panel program has complied with all of


the requirements set forth in this paragraph.


I. A person convicted of a felony offense or receiving any form


of probation for an offense in which registration is required


pursuant to the Sex Offenders Registration Act, shall submit to


deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) testing for law enforcement


identification purposes in accordance with Section 150.27 of Title


of the Oklahoma Statutes and the rules promulgated by the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation for the OSBI Combined DNA

Req. No. 1320 Page 28


Index System (CODIS) Database. Subject to the availability of


funds, any person convicted of a misdemeanor offense of assault and


battery, domestic abuse, stalking, possession of a controlled


substance prohibited under the Uniform Controlled Dangerous


Substances Act, outraging public decency, resisting arrest, escape


or attempting to escape, eluding a police officer, Peeping Tom,


pointing a firearm, threatening an act of violence, breaking and


entering a dwelling place, destruction of property, negligent


homicide or causing a personal injury accident while driving under


the influence of any intoxicating substance, or any alien unlawfully


present under federal immigration law, upon arrest, shall submit to


DNA testing for law enforcement identification purposes in


accordance with Section 150.27 of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes


and the rules promulgated by the Oklahoma State Bureau of


Investigation for the OSBI Combined DNA Index System (CODIS)


Database. Any defendant sentenced to probation shall be required to


submit to testing within thirty (30) days of sentencing either to


the Department of Corrections or to the county sheriff or other


peace officer as directed by the court. Defendants who are


sentenced to a term of incarceration shall submit to testing in


accordance with Section 530.1 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


for those defendants who enter the custody of the Department of


Corrections or to the county sheriff, for those defendants sentenced


to incarceration in a county jail. Convicted individuals who have

Req. No. 1320 Page 29


previously submitted to DNA testing under this section and for whom


a valid sample is on file in the OSBI Combined DNA Index System


(CODIS) Database at the time of sentencing shall not be required to


submit to additional testing. Except as required by the Sex


Offenders Registration Act, a deferred judgment does not require


submission to DNA testing.


Any person who is incarcerated in the custody of the Department


of Corrections after July 1, 1996, and who has not been released


before January 1, 2006, shall provide a blood or saliva sample prior


to release. Every person subject to DNA testing after January 1,


2006, whose sentence does not include a term of confinement with the


Department of Corrections shall submit a blood or saliva sample.


Every person subject to DNA testing who is sentenced to unsupervised


probation or otherwise not supervised by the Department of


Corrections shall submit for blood or saliva testing to the sheriff


of the sentencing county.


J. Samples of blood or saliva for DNA testing required by


subsection I of this section shall be taken by employees or


contractors of the Department of Corrections, peace officers, or the


county sheriff or employees or contractors of the sheriff’s office.


The individuals shall be properly trained to collect blood or saliva


samples. Persons collecting blood or saliva for DNA testing


pursuant to this section shall be immune from civil liabilities


arising from this activity. All collectors of DNA samples shall

Req. No. 1320 Page 30


ensure the collection of samples are mailed to the Oklahoma State


Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of the time the subject


appears for testing or within ten (10) days of the date the subject


comes into physical custody to serve a term of incarceration. All


collectors of DNA samples shall use sample kits provided by the OSBI


and procedures promulgated by the OSBI. Persons subject to DNA


testing who are not received at the Lexington Assessment and


Reception Center shall be required to pay a fee of Fifteen Dollars


($15.00) to the agency collecting the sample for submission to the


OSBI Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) Database. Any fees collected


pursuant to this subsection shall be deposited in the revolving


account or the service fee account of the collection agency or


department.


K. When sentencing a person who has been convicted of a crime


that would subject that person to the provisions of the Sex


Offenders Registration Act, neither the court nor the district


attorney shall be allowed to waive or exempt such person from the


registration requirements of the Sex Offenders Registration Act.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 991b, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 991b. A. Whenever a sentence has been suspended by the


court after conviction of a person for any crime, the suspended


sentence of the person may not be revoked, in whole or part, for any


cause unless a petition setting forth the grounds for such

Req. No. 1320 Page 31


revocation is filed by the district attorney with the clerk of the


sentencing court and competent evidence justifying the revocation of


the suspended sentence is presented to the court at a hearing to be


held for that purpose within twenty (20) days after the entry of the


plea of not guilty to the petition, unless waived by both the state


and the defendant. The State of Oklahoma may dismiss the petition


without prejudice one time upon good cause shown to the court,


provided that any successor petition must be filed within forty-five


(45) days of the date of the dismissal of the petition.


B. Whenever a sentence has been suspended by the court after


conviction of a person for any crime, the suspended sentence of the


person may not be revoked in whole for a technical violation unless


a petition setting forth the grounds for such revocation is filed by


the district attorney with the clerk of the sentencing court and


competent evidence justifying the revocation of the suspended


sentence is presented to the court at a hearing to be held for that


purpose within twenty (20) days after the entry of the plea of not


guilty to the petition, unless waived by both the state and the


defendant. The State of Oklahoma may dismiss the petition without


prejudice one time upon good cause shown to the court; provided,


that any successor petition must be filed within forty-five (45)


days of the date of the dismissal of the petition. Any revocation


of a suspended sentence based on a technical violation shall not



Req. No. 1320 Page 32


exceed six (6) months for a first revocation and five (5) years for


a second or subsequent revocation.


C. “Technical violation” as used in this section means a


violation of the court-imposed rules and conditions of probation,


other than:


1. Committing or being arrested for a new crime;


2. Attempting to falsify a drug screen, or three or more failed


drug or alcohol screens within a three-month period;


3. Failing to pay restitution;


4. Tampering with an electronic monitoring device;


5. Failing to initially report or missing assigned reporting


requirements for an excess of sixty (60) days;


6. Unlawfully contacting a victim, codefendant or criminal


associates;


7. Five or more separate and distinct technical violations


within a ninety-day period; or


8. Any violation of the Specialized Sex Offender Rules.


D. 1. The Department of Corrections shall develop a matrix of


technical violations and sanctions to address violations committed


by persons who are being supervised by the Department. The


Department shall be authorized to use a violation response and


intermediate sanction process based on the sanction matrix to apply


to any technical violations of probationers. Within four (4)


working days of the discovery of the violation, the probation

Req. No. 1320 Page 33


officer shall initiate the violation response and intermediate


sanction process. The sentencing judge may authorize any


recommended sanctions, which may include, but are not limited to:


short-term jail or lockup, day treatment, program attendance,


community service, outpatient or inpatient treatment, monetary


fines, curfews, ignition interlock devices on vehicles, or a one-


time referral to a term of confinement of six (6) months in an


intermediate revocation facility operated by the Department of


Corrections; provided, upon approval of the district attorney, a


person may be sanctioned to serve additional terms of confinement in


an intermediate revocation facility. The probation officer shall


complete a sanction form, which shall specify the technical


violation, sanction, and the action plan to correct the noncompliant


behavior resulting in the technical violation. The probation


officer shall refer to the sanctioning matrix to determine the


supervision, treatment, and sanctions appropriate to address the


noncompliant behavior. The probation officer shall refer the


violation information and recommended response with a sanction plan


to the Department of Corrections to be heard by a hearing officer.


The Department of Corrections shall develop a sanction matrix,


forms, policies and procedures necessary to implement this


provision. The Department of Corrections shall establish procedures


to hear responses to technical violations and review sanction plans


including the following:

Req. No. 1320 Page 34


a. hearing officers shall report through a chain of


command separate from that of the supervising


probation officers,


b. the Department shall provide the offender written


notice of the violation, the evidence relied upon, and


the reason the sanction was imposed,


c. the hearing shall be held unless the offender waives


the right to the hearing,


d. hearings shall be electronically recorded, and


e. the Department shall provide to judges and district


attorneys a record of all violations and actions taken


pursuant to this subsection.


2. The hearing officer shall determine based on a preponderance


of the evidence whether a technical violation occurred. Upon a


finding that a technical violation occurred, the hearing officer may


order the offender to participate in the recommended sanction plan


or may modify the plan. Offenders who accept the sanction plan


shall sign a violation response sanction form, and the hearing


officer shall then impose the sanction. Failure of the offender to


comply with the imposed sanction plan shall constitute a violation


of the rules and conditions of supervision that may result in a


revocation proceeding. If an offender does not voluntarily accept


the recommended sanction plan, the Department shall either impose


the sanction and allow the offender to appeal to the district court,

Req. No. 1320 Page 35


or request a revocation proceeding as provided by law. Every


administrative hearing and sanction imposed by the Department shall


be appealable to the district court.


3. Absent a finding of willful nonpayment by the offender, the


failure of an offender to pay fines and costs may not serve as a


basis for revocation, excluding restitution.


E. 1. Where one of the grounds for revocation is the failure


of the defendant to make restitution as ordered, the Department of


Corrections shall forward to the district attorney all information


pertaining to the failure of the defendant to make timely


restitution as ordered by the court, and the district attorney shall


file a petition setting forth the grounds for revocation.


2. The defendant ordered to make restitution can petition the


court at any time for remission or a change in the terms of the


order of restitution if the defendant undergoes a change of


condition which materially affects the ability of the defendant to


comply with the order of the court.


3. At the hearing, if one of the grounds for the petition for


revocation is the failure of the defendant to make timely


restitution as ordered by the court, the court will hear evidence


and if it appears to the satisfaction of the court from such


evidence that the terms of the order of restitution create a


manifest hardship on the defendant or the immediate family of the


defendant, the court may cancel all or any part of the amount still

Req. No. 1320 Page 36


due, or modify the terms or method of payment; provided, however,


the court shall continue to prioritize an order for payments of


restitution to the victim to the extent feasible. Provided, if the


court determines that a reduction in the restitution still due is


warranted, the court shall equally apply the same percentage


reduction to any court-ordered monetary obligation owed by the


defendant including, but not limited to, fines, court costs and


costs of incarceration.


F. The court may revoke a portion of the sentence and leave the


remaining part not revoked, but suspended for the remainder of the


term of the sentence, and under the provisions applying to it. The


person whose suspended sentence is being considered for revocation


at the hearing shall have the right to be represented by counsel, to


present competent evidence in his or her own behalf and to be


confronted by the witnesses against the defendant. Any order of the


court revoking the suspended sentence, in whole or in part, shall be


subject to review on appeal, as in other appeals of criminal cases.


Provided, however, that if the crime for which the suspended


sentence is given was a felony, the defendant may be allowed bail


pending appeal. If the reason for revocation be that the defendant


committed a felony, the defendant shall not be allowed bail pending


appeal.


G. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B of


this section, when the suspended sentence of a person is being

Req. No. 1320 Page 37


considered for revocation for an offense where the penalty has


subsequently been lowered to a misdemeanor, the sentence shall be


modified to a term that does not exceed the current maximum


sentence.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 991f, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 991f. A. For the purposes of any provision of Title 22


of the Oklahoma Statutes relating to criminal sentencing and


restitution orders and for the Restitution and Diversion Program:


1. “Restitution” means the sum to be paid by the defendant to


the victim of the criminal act to compensate that victim for up to


three times the amount of the economic loss suffered as a direct


result of the criminal act of the defendant;


2. “Victim” means any person, partnership, corporation or legal


entity that suffers an economic loss as a direct result of the


criminal act of another person; and


3. “Economic loss” means actual financial detriment suffered by


the victim consisting of medical expenses actually incurred, damage


to or loss of real and personal property and any other out-of-pocket


expenses, including loss of earnings, reasonably incurred as the


direct result of the criminal act of the defendant. No other


elements of damage shall be included as an economic loss for


purposes of this section.



Req. No. 1320 Page 38


B. In all criminal prosecutions and juvenile proceedings in


this state, when the court shall prioritize an order for payments of


restitution to the victim to the extent feasible. When the court


enters an order directing the offender to pay restitution to any


victim for economic loss or to pay to the state any fines, fees or


assessments, the order, for purposes of validity and collection,


shall not be limited to the maximum term of imprisonment for which


the offender could have been sentenced, nor limited to any term of


probation, parole, or extension thereof, nor expire until fully


satisfied. The court order for restitution, fines, fees or


assessments shall remain a continuing obligation of the offender


until fully satisfied, and the obligation shall not be considered a


debt, nor shall the obligation be dischargeable in any bankruptcy


proceeding. The court order shall continue in full force and effect


with the supervision of the state until fully satisfied, and the


state shall use all methods of collection authorized by law.


C. 1. Upon conviction for any crime wherein property has been


stolen, converted or otherwise unlawfully obtained, or its value


substantially decreased as a direct result of the crime, or wherein


the crime victim suffered injury, loss of income, or out-of-pocket


loss, the individuals criminally responsible shall be sentenced to


make restitution. Restitution may be ordered in addition to the


punishments prescribed by law.



Req. No. 1320 Page 39


2. The court shall order full restitution based upon the


following considerations:


a. the nature and amount of restitution shall be


sufficient to restore the crime victim to the


equivalent economic status existing prior to the


losses sustained as a direct result of the crime, and


may allow the crime victim to receive payment in


excess of the losses sustained; provided, the excess


amount of restitution shall not be more than treble


the actual economic loss incurred, and


b. the amount of restitution shall be established


regardless of the financial resources of the offender.


3. The court:


a. may direct the return of property to be made as soon


as practicable and make an award of restitution in the


amount of the loss of value to the property itself as


a direct result of the crime, including out-of-pocket


expenses and loss of earnings incurred as a result of


damage to or loss of use of the property, the cost to


return the property to the victim or to restore the


property to its pre-crime condition whichever may be


appropriate under the circumstances,


b. may order restitution in a lump sum or by such


schedules as may be established and thereafter

Req. No. 1320 Page 40


adjusted by agreement consistent with the order of the


court,


c. shall have the authority to amend or alter any order


of restitution made pursuant to this section providing


that the court shall state its reasons and conclusions


as a matter of record for any change or amendment to


any previous order,


d. may order interest upon any ordered restitution sum to


accrue at the rate of twelve percent (12%) per annum


until the restitution is paid in full. The court may


further order such interest to be paid to the victims


of the crime or proportion the interest payment


between the victims and the court fund, and/or the


Restitution and Diversion Program, in the discretion


of the court, and


e. shall consider any pre-existing orders imposed on the


defendant, including, but not limited to, orders


imposed under civil and criminal proceedings.


D. If restitution to more than one person, agency or entity is


set at the same time, the court shall establish the following


priorities of payment:


1. The crime victim or victims; and


2. Any other government agency which has provided reimbursement


to the victim as a result of the offender’s criminal conduct.

Req. No. 1320 Page 41


E. 1. The district attorney’s office shall present the crime


victim’s restitution claim to the court at the time of the


conviction of the offender or the restitution provisions shall be


included in the written plea agreement presented to the court, in


which case, the restitution claim shall be reviewed by the judge


prior to acceptance of the plea agreement.


2. At the initiation of the prosecution of the defendant, the


district attorney’s office shall provide all identifiable crime


victims with written and oral information explaining their rights


and responsibilities to receive restitution established under this


section.


3. The district attorney’s office shall provide all crime


victims, regardless of whether the crime victim makes a specific


request, with an official request for restitution form to be


completed and signed by the crime victim, and to include all


invoices, bills, receipts, and other evidence of injury, loss of


earnings and out-of-pocket loss. This form shall be filed with any


victim impact statement to be included in the judgment and sentence.


Every crime victim receiving the restitution claim form shall be


provided assistance and direction to properly complete the form.


4. The official restitution request form shall be presented in


all cases regardless of whether the case is brought to trial. In a


plea bargain, the district attorney in every case where the victim


has suffered economic loss, shall, as a part of the plea bargain,

Req. No. 1320 Page 42


require that the offender pay restitution to the crime victim. The


district attorney shall be authorized to act as a clearing house for


collection and disbursement of restitution payments made pursuant to


this section, and shall assess a fee of One Dollar ($1.00) per


payment received from the defendant, except when the defendant is


sentenced to incarceration in the Department of Corrections.


F. The crime victim shall provide all documentation and


evidence of compensation or reimbursement from insurance companies


or agencies of this state, any other state, or the federal


government received as a direct result of the crime for injury, loss


of earnings or out-of-pocket loss.


G. The court shall, upon motion by the crime victim, redact


from the submitted documentation all personal information relating


to the crime victim that does not directly and necessarily establish


the authenticity of any document or substantiate the asserted amount


of the restitution claim.


H. The unexcused failure or refusal of the crime victim to


provide all or part of the requisite information prior to the


sentencing, unless disclosure is deferred by the court, shall


constitute a waiver of any grounds to appeal or seek future


amendment or alteration of the restitution order predicated on the


undisclosed available information. The court shall order the


offender to submit either as part of the pre-sentence investigation


or assessment and evaluation required for a community sentence or,

Req. No. 1320 Page 43


if no pre-sentence investigation is conducted, in advance of the


sentencing proceeding such information as the court may direct and


finds necessary to be disclosed for the purpose of ascertaining the


type and manner of restitution to be ordered.


I. The willful failure or refusal of the offender to provide


all or part of the requisite information prior to the sentencing,


unless disclosure is deferred by the court shall not deprive the


court of the authority to set restitution or set the schedule of


payment. The willful failure or refusal of the offender to provide


all or part of the requisite information prior to the sentencing,


unless disclosure is deferred by the court, shall constitute a


waiver of any grounds to appeal or seek future amendment or


alteration of the restitution order predicated on the undisclosed


information. The willful failure or refusal of the offender to


provide all or part of the requisite information prior to


sentencing, unless disclosure is deferred by the court, shall


constitute an act of contempt.


J. The court shall conduct such hearings or proceedings as it


deems necessary to set restitution and payment schedules at the time


of sentencing or may bifurcate the sentencing and defer the hearing


or proceedings relating to the imposition of restitution as justice


may require. Amendments or alterations to the restitution order may


be made upon the court’s own motion, petition by the crime victim or


petition by the offender.

Req. No. 1320 Page 44


K. An offender who files a meritless or frivolous petition for


amendment or alteration to the restitution order shall pay the costs


of the proceeding on the petition and shall have added to the


existing restitution order the additional loss of earnings and out-


of-pocket loss incurred by the crime victim in responding to the


petition.


L. The restitution request form shall be promulgated by the


District Attorneys Council and provided to all district attorney


offices.


M. If a defendant who is financially able refuses or neglects


to pay restitution as ordered by this section, payment may be


enforced:


1. By contempt of court as provided in subsection A of Section


566 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes with imprisonment or fine


or both;


2. In the same manner as prescribed in subsection N of this


section for a defendant who is without means to make such


restitution payment; or


3. Revocation of the criminal sentence if the sentence imposed


was a suspended or deferred sentence or a community sentence.


N. If the defendant is without means to pay the restitution,


the judge may direct the total amount due, or any portion thereof,


to be entered upon the court minutes and to be certified in the


district court of the county where it shall then be entered upon the

Req. No. 1320 Page 45


district court judgment docket and shall have the full force and


effect of a district court judgment in a civil case. Thereupon the


same remedies shall be available for the enforcement of the judgment


as are available to enforce other judgments; provided, however, the


judgment herein prescribed shall not be considered a debt nor


dischargeable in any bankruptcy proceeding.


O. Whenever a person has been ordered to pay restitution as


provided in this section or any section of the Oklahoma Statutes for


a criminal penalty, the judge may order the defendant to a term of


community service, with or without compensation, to be credited at a


rate of Five Dollars ($5.00) per day against the total amount due


for restitution. If the defendant fails to perform the required


community service authorized by this subsection or if the conditions


of community service are violated, the judge may impose a term of


imprisonment not to exceed five (5) days in the county jail for each


failure to comply.


P. Nothing in subsections M through O of this section shall be


construed to be additions to the original criminal penalty, but


shall be used by the court as sanctions and means of collection for


criminal restitution orders and restitution orders that have been


reduced to judgment.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1320 TEK 12/30/2024 11:21:10 AM

Req. No. 1320 Page 46